District of Columbia statutes.
8-1071

Definitions.

[Not funded].

Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-294, § 2, 60 DCR 2619

History

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-294: Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-294 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Editor's Notes